Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5402.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The fifteenth paragraph of section 1I of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out clauses (l) and (m) and
inserting in place thereof the following 3 clauses:-
(l) nutrition and wellness programs;
(m) genocide education programs; and
(n) student safety education course.
SECTION 2. Said section 1I of said chapter 69, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the fifteenth paragraph the following paragraph:-
Annually, not later than December 31, the commissioner, in consultation with school
districts, shall provide a report on the progress of the student safety education course in private,
public, vocational and charter schools in the commonwealth, kindergarten to grade 12, inclusive,
of 3

to the chairs of the joint committee on education and the clerks of the house of representatives
and the senate. The report shall provide a description of the manner in which the student safety
education course is being offered including, but not limited to: (i) the number of hours of
instruction offered; (ii) the grade levels at which such instruction is offered; and (iii) the title and
description of the course in which such instruction is integrated.
SECTION 3. Said chapter 69 is hereby further amended by adding the following section:-
Section 40. (a) Every private school and school district shall, for the purpose of educating
kindergarten to grade 12, inclusive, provide instruction on student safety education consistent
with the content standards framework adopted by the board of elementary and secondary
education; provided, however, that a private school and school district may partner with trained
local city and town public safety professionals including, but not limited to, a: (i) police officer;
(ii) firefighter; (iii) emergency medical technician; (iv) paramedic or (v) other first responder to
implement a student safety education course for the purpose of educating kindergarten to grade
12, inclusive, students on preparedness for common dangers and emergencies.
(b) The student safety education course shall be taught in the month of September of each
school year.
(c) The student safety education course shall include at least a 1-hour safety
demonstration video, presented by, but not limited to, a local police officer, firefighter, and an
emergency medical technician or paramedic. The video shall cover, but not be limited to, the
subjects of: (i) pedestrian safety; (ii) cycling safety; (iii) how to report emergencies; (iv)
preventing child abductions by strangers; (v) saying no to drugs; (vi) how to handle bullying;
(vii) what to do if a student comes across a firearm; (viii) fire prevention and simple
of 3

extinguishing methods; (ix) how to handle a family medical emergency in a student’s presence;
(x) how to help another student or themselves when choking; and (xi) any emergency first aid
procedures.
(c) The department shall assist schools in providing: (i) instruction on student safety by
facilitating access to high-quality course materials; and (ii) professional development training,
including the provision of trainings, seminars, conferences and materials, for educators and
public safety professionals to use in the teaching of student safety.
(d) The department may provide trainings, seminars, conferences and materials for
educators and public safety professionals to use in the teaching public safety to students in
person or through the use of synchronous or asynchronous audio, video, electronic media or
other telecommunications technology.
(e) The department shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement the student safety
education course established in this section.
of 3